Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-206
Terms of court, special.

The judges of the Supreme Court, or a majority of them, are hereby authorized to appoint and hold a special term of said court at such time as they may designate, for disposing of the unfinished business of any general term of said court, and may appoint one special term of said court in any one year for general or special purposes.

Laws 1879, § 15, p. 84;

R.S.1913, § 1142;

C.S.1922, § 1071;

C.S.1929, § 27-206;

R.S.1943, § 24-206.